test/src/gt-norm-yamls/V-lex_kavnad_gt-norm.gen.yaml
Config: 
  hfst: 
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-dict-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-dict-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox: 
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-dict-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-dict-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests: 


  Verb - kavnâđ: # generated from FST, to be corrected
    kavnâđ+V+Inf: kavnâđ
    kavnâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: kaavnâm
    kavnâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg2: kaavnah
    kavnâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: kávná
    kavnâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Du1: kävneen
    kavnâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Du2: kavnâvettee
    kavnâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Du3: kavnâv
    kavnâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Pl1: kavnâp
    kavnâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Pl2: kavnâvetteđ # kavnâvetteđ ?
    kavnâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Pl3: kävneh
    kavnâđ+V+Ind+Prt+Sg1: kavnim # kavnim corpus
    kavnâđ+V+Ind+Prt+Sg2: kavnih # kavnih
    kavnâđ+V+Ind+Prt+Sg3: kaavnâi
    kavnâđ+V+Ind+Prt+Du1: kavnáim # kavnáim
    kavnâđ+V+Ind+Prt+Du2: kavnáid # kavnáid
    kavnâđ+V+Ind+Prt+Du3: kavnáin # kavnáin
    kavnâđ+V+Ind+Prt+Pl1: kaavnâim # kaavnâim
    kavnâđ+V+Ind+Prt+Pl2: kaavnâid # kaavnâid
    kavnâđ+V+Ind+Prt+Pl3: kavnii # kavnii corpus
    kavnâđ+V+Cond+Prs+Sg1: kavnâččim
    kavnâđ+V+Cond+Prs+Sg2: kavnâččih
    kavnâđ+V+Cond+Prs+Sg3: kavnâččij
    kavnâđ+V+Cond+Prs+Du1: kavnâččáim
    kavnâđ+V+Cond+Prs+Du2: kavnâččáid
    kavnâđ+V+Cond+Prs+Du3: kavnâččáin
    kavnâđ+V+Cond+Prs+Pl1: kavnâččijm
    kavnâđ+V+Cond+Prs+Pl2: kavnâččijd
    kavnâđ+V+Cond+Prs+Pl3: kavnâččii
    kavnâđ+V+Pot+Prs+Sg1: kävneem # kävneem
    kavnâđ+V+Pot+Prs+Sg2: kävneeh # kävneeh
    kavnâđ+V+Pot+Prs+Sg3: kaavnâš
    kavnâđ+V+Pot+Prs+Du1: kavnâžeen
    kavnâđ+V+Pot+Prs+Du2: kaavnâšvettee
    kavnâđ+V+Pot+Prs+Du3: kavnâžává
    kavnâđ+V+Pot+Prs+Pl1: kavnâžep
    kavnâđ+V+Pot+Prs+Pl2: kaavnâšvetteđ
    kavnâđ+V+Pot+Prs+Pl3: kavnâžeh
    kavnâđ+V+Imprt+Sg2: käävnâ
    kavnâđ+V+Imprt+Sg3: kävnus
    kavnâđ+V+Imprt+Du1: kävnoon
    kavnâđ+V+Imprt+Du2: kävnee
    kavnâđ+V+Imprt+Du3: kävnus
    kavnâđ+V+Imprt+Pl1: kävnup
    kavnâđ+V+Imprt+Pl2: kavnâđ
    kavnâđ+V+Imprt+Pl3: kävnus
    kavnâđ+V+Ind+Prs+ConNeg: kaavnâ
    kavnâđ+V+Ind+Prt+ConNeg: kavnâm
    kavnâđ+V+Pot+Prs+ConNeg: kaavnii
    kavnâđ+V+PrsPrc: kävnee
    kavnâđ+V+PrfPrc: kavnâm
    kavnâđ+V+Actio+Nom: kavnâm
    kavnâđ+V+Actio+Ess: kävnâmin
    kavnâđ+V+Actio+Loc: kävnâmist
    kavnâđ+V+Actio+Ill: kävnâmân
    kavnâđ+V+VAbess: kavnâhennáá
    kavnâđ+V+VAbess: kavnâhinnáá
    kavnâđ+V+VAbess: kavnâhánnáá
